Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Programs ..............................  $ 1,978,057,903
(2) Central services, statewide
assessments and enterprise-
wide costs ............................. $ 152,079,492
(3) Capital improvement............. $ 725,501
(4) Debt service .......................... $ 67,710,170
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare  receipts and fed-
eral funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, In-
fants and Children Program  food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the
Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program  and
emergency preparedness and response services, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds
not described in this  section, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the
following purposes:
(1) Programs ..............................  $ 2,827,755,114
(2) Central services, statewide
assessments and enterprise-
wide costs ............................. $ 27,961,701
(3) Shared administrative
services ................................. $ 151,620,401
(4) Capital improvement............. $ 725,501
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 1
(1) Gambling addiction programs $ 12,230,163
(2) Central services, statewide
assessments and enterprise-
wide costs ............................. $ 231,570
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2017
Act, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Programs .............................. $10,853,330,181
(2) Central services, statewide
assessments and enterprise-
wide costs ............................. $ 69,501,278
SECTION 5.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the following  expenditures by the
Oregon Health Authority are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Women, Infants and Children Program food vouchers.
(2) Expenditures for the federal funds debt service on Build America Bonds.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,956,729,821 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,617,521,159 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 8. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5026 (HB 5026-A) Page 2